Illinois, session 104th, SB1429.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5adding Section 25.1 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/25.1 new)7    Sec. 25.1. Cryptocurrency mining facility noise. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Cryptocurrency" means a type of virtual currency that 10uses cryptography to secure transactions that are digitally 11recorded on a distributed ledger, such as a blockchain.12    "Cryptocurrency mining" means the process whereby 13computers, also known as nodes or mining rigs, validate 14blockchain transactions for a specific cryptocurrency and, in 15turn, receive a mining reward for their computational efforts. 16"Cryptocurrency mining" includes the use of necessarily 17related devices and procedures, including cooling devices and 18procedures.19    "Cryptocurrency mining facility" means a facility where 20cryptocurrency mining occurs.21    (b) For the purposes of limiting excessive noise created 22by cryptocurrency mining that endangers physical and emotional 23health and well-being, interferes with legitimate business and   SB1429- 2 -LRB104 05984 BDA 16017 b1recreational activities, increases construction costs, 2depresses property values, offends the senses, creates public 3nuisances, or reduces the quality of the surrounding 4environment, cryptocurrency mining facilities shall apply 5noise-reduction techniques, including, but not limited to:6        (1) using liquid cooling or submerged cooling;7        (2) fully enclosing the envelope where noise from the 8    operation of cryptocurrency mining is directly produced 9    around all sides, including above and below the equipment 10    producing the noise, with material that is reasonably 11    calculated by industry standards to reduce noise emissions 12    to a level that is acceptable to a reasonable person under 13    similar circumstances; or14        (3) locating or relocating to:15            (A) a minimum of 2,000 feet from the nearest 16        residential or commercial use structure; or17            (B) an area zoned for industrial use.18    (c) The Board shall adopt rules implementing this Section.19    (d) The Agency, as the noise control agency for the State, 20shall enforce the provisions of this Section, as well as rules 21adopted under this Section. The Agency may adopt rules to 22administer and implement this Section, as applicable.